test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-minaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - minā~ma: # pronouns 6 'eng /est mina/fin' - full paradigm
     minā+N+Sg+Nom: [minā, ma]
     minā+N+Sg+Gen: [miʼn, min]
     minā+N+Sg+Par: mīnda
     minā+N+Sg+Dat: [miʼnnõn, minnõn]
     minā+N+Sg+Ins: [miʼnkõks, minkõks]
     minā+N+Sg+Ill: [[miʼnnõ, miʼnnõz], [minnõ, miʼnnõz]]
     minā+N+Sg+Ela: [miʼnstõ, minstõ]
